Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
S

URFACE MINING

Cross references.

- Manner in which laws pertaining to permitting of dams and artificial barriers apply to barriers constructed in connection with or incidental to surface mining activities,

§

12-5-376

.

Obtaining rights of way for mining and quarrying purposes,

§

44-9-70

et seq.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Georgia's Environmental Law: A Survey," see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 633 (1972). For article discussing regulation of selected activities to effect environmental planning, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 53 (1975). For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).

12-4-70. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Surface Mining Act of 1968."

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 1.)

12-4-71. Legislative purpose; duty of Environmental Protection Division to administer part.

The purposes of this part are:

To assist in achieving and maintaining an efficient and productive mining industry and to assist in increasing economic and other benefits attributable to mining;

To advance the protection of fish and wildlife and the protection and restoration of land, water, and other resources affected by mining;

To assist in the reduction, elimination, or counteracting of pollution or deterioration of land, water, and air attributable to mining;

To encourage programs which will achieve comparable results in protecting, conserving, and improving the usefulness of natural resources to the end that the most desirable conduct of mining and related operations may be universally facilitated;

To assist in efforts to facilitate the use of land and other resources affected by mining so that such use may be consistent with sound land use, public health, and public safety, and to this end to study and recommend, wherever desirable, techniques for the improvement, restoration, or protection of such land and other resources.

The Environmental Protection Division of the department shall administer this part consistent with the above-stated purposes.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a hyphen was inserted in "above stated" near the end of subsection (b).

12-4-72. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Affected land" means the area of land which has been subjected to surface mining, or upon which overburden has been deposited, or both; provided, however, "affected land" shall not be construed to include land upon which overburden is deposited if, in the opinion of the division, the disposition of such overburden amounts to reclamation of a previously mined area.

(1.1) "Borrow pit" means an excavated area where naturally occurring earthen materials are to be removed for use as ordinary fill at another location. Such term shall not include excavated areas of fewer than five acres which are incidental to forestry land management and from which no earthen material is removed for sale.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Government securities" means obligations of the United States or of the State of Georgia, or any bureau, agency, or authority thereof, which are fully guaranteed as to the principal and interest by the United States or the State of Georgia.

"Inspector" means any authorized employee of the Environmental Protection Division who is responsible for the administration or enforcement of this part.

"Mineral" means clay, stone, gravel, sand, phosphate, rock, metallic ore, and any other solid material or substance of commercial value found in natural deposits on or in the earth.

"Mining land use plan" means an operator's written proposal for accomplishing land use objectives on the affected land. The term shall include, but not be limited to, an operator's plans prior to, during, and following active mining for erosion and sedimentation control, protection of properties on the National Register of Historic Places, grading, disposal of refuse, reclamation and revegetation, and the time of completion of the plan.

"Mining operator" means any person, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, municipality, or county engaged in or controlling one or more surface mining operations.

"Overburden" means all of the earth and other materials which lie above natural deposits of ores or minerals, and includes all earth and other materials disturbed from their natural state in the process of surface mining.

"Peak" means a projecting point of overburden removed from its natural position and deposited elsewhere in the process of surface mining.

"Pit" means a tract of land from which overburden has been or is being removed for the purpose of surface mining.

"Reclamation" means the reconditioning or rehabilitation of affected land under an approved mining land use plan.

"Refuse" means all waste material exclusive of overburden directly connected with the mining, cleaning, and preparation of substances mined by surface mining.

"Ridge" means a lengthened elevation of overburden removed from its natural position and deposited elsewhere in the process of surface mining.

"Spoil bank" means overburden removed from its natural position and deposited elsewhere in the process of surface mining.

"Surface mining" means any activity constituting all or part of a process for the removal of minerals, ores, and other solid matter for sale or for processing or for consumption in the regular operation of a business. Tunnels, shafts, borrow pits of less than 1.1 disturbed acres, and dimension stone quarries shall not be considered to be surface mining.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 200, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 996, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1098, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 168, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 593, § 1/SB 156.)

12-4-73. Powers and duties of division as to surface mining generally; division may decline to assert jurisdiction.

The division shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer and enforce this part and all reasonable rules and regulations promulgated under this part to issue such orders as may be necessary to enforce compliance therewith;

To examine and pass upon permit applications of operators;

To examine and pass upon surface mining land use plans submitted by operators;

To make investigations and inspections;

To revoke permits, deny renewals, and forfeit bonds or cash of mine operators who refuse to carry out their plans of mining land use;

To collect information on surface mining and mining land use plans;

To collect, publish in print or electronically, and distribute information on mining land uses;

To accept moneys that are available from government units and private organizations;

To conduct research studies of mining land uses;

To carry out land use projects on land where bonds or cash have been forfeited, using funds available for such purposes;

To institute and prosecute all such court actions as may be necessary to obtain the enforcement of any order issued by the division in carrying out this part; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

The powers and duties described in this Code section may be exercised and performed by the division through such duly authorized agents and employees as it deems necessary and proper.

The division may decline to assert jurisdiction under this part over any class or category of mines where, in the opinion of the division, the effect of the operations of such mines is not sufficiently substantial to warrant the exercise of jurisdiction under this part.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 5; Ga. L. 1971, p. 200, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1509, 1534; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1266, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 527, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1098, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.)

12-4-74. Promulgation of rules and regulations by Board of Natural Resources.

The Board of Natural Resources shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate this part in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 9.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Surface mining, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-3.

12-4-75. Permits for surface mining operations; submission of mining land use plan and amendment to plan; bonding of applicants.

Operators of surface mining firms shall be required:

To obtain from the director of the division a permit to conduct surface mining operations in the specified area to be mined prior to commencing the operation of same, provided that where a change in ownership of a mining operation occurs, the new owners may continue such operation on condition that a valid application, mining land use plan, and bond sufficient as to form and content for final approval are placed on file with the director within 60 days from date of consummation of the ownership change. In the event the new owners fail to place on file with the director the necessary documents for permitting within said 60 day period, all activities associated with removal of minerals or ores from the premises shall cease. It is further provided that a mining operator who continues to conduct a surface mining operation under a previous owner's permit in accordance with this paragraph shall be subject to having said permit revoked in the same manner and under the same conditions as a mining operator conducting a surface mining operation under his own permit. The application for a permit shall be made on a form provided by the director. The permit shall be issued on evidence satisfactory to the director of compliance with this part and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, and the permit shall be conditioned upon the permittee's compliance with the approved mining land use plan;

To submit, with the application for a permit, a mining land use plan which shall be consistent with the land use in the area of the mine and shall provide for reclamation of the affected land. Once approved, the operator will be responsible for completion of the plan. However, any change affecting a new area or any other change in an approved plan must be submitted to the division for approval as an amendment to an operator's mining land use plan;

To file a bond with the director within 60 days after the date of being furnished approved surety bond forms by the division; provided, however, that any mining operator who desires to be exempted from the bonding requirement shall request an exemption from such bonding requirement from the director, whereupon a mining operator may be exempted from such bonding requirement at the discretion of the director. Any mining operator who has been granted an exemption from the bonding requirement and who subsequently violates any of the provisions of this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, or who defaults on his obligations under any mining land use plan, may be required by the director to post a bond in accordance with this paragraph. Any bond filed with the director shall be written by a surety approved by the director and authorized to transact business in this state. Such bond shall be fixed by the director in an amount not more than $2,500.00 per acre, or fraction thereof, of the area of affected land. Such bond shall further be payable to the Governor and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this part and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part. Mining operators shall have the option of posting bond, government securities, cash, or any combination thereof on each mined area. In determining the amount of bond, government securities, or cash within the above limits, the director shall take into consideration the character and nature of the land reclamation requirements as approved in the operator's mining land use plan. For each permit, the director shall review and reevaluate at least every five years the site operation, objectives of the land use plan, and estimated cost factors for completion of the plan and shall require adjustments to bonding amounts as may be necessary to ensure adequate funding for site reclamation. The bond, government securities, or cash shall be held by the division until the affected land or any portion thereof is satisfactorily reclaimed, in the opinion of the director, at which time the bond, government securities, or cash or portion thereof shall be terminated or returned to the mining operator, provided that where a mining operator fails or refuses to complete any of his responsibilities under a mining land use plan and the bond, government securities, or cash are consequently recovered upon or forfeited, the director may expend as he deems appropriate that portion of such recovered or forfeited funds as is necessary to complete such mining operator's responsibilities under the mining land use plan. A mining operator, upon approval of an amended mining land use plan, shall file with the director the appropriate bond, government securities, or cash to cover the plan as amended, unless otherwise exempted from the bonding requirement.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 200, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 527, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 879, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1098, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-4-76. Substitution of mined areas.

An operator shall have the right to substitute an area mined in the past for an area presently being mined on an acre-for-acre basis with the approval of the division.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 7.)

12-4-77. Renewal or replacement of revoked permit; mining on unauthorized site.

An operator whose permit has been revoked pursuant to this part shall be denied a new permit or a renewal of the old permit to engage in surface mining until he gives assurance satisfactory to the director of the division of his ability and intent to comply fully with this part with respect to the affected land under the revoked permit and the new or renewed permit. Mining by a permitted operator on an unauthorized site while holding other valid surface mining permits shall constitute prima-facie evidence of violation of approved mining land use plans, and any and all surface mining permits which an operator may hold may be suspended or revoked by the director or his authorized representative.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 996, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 527, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1098, § 4.)

12-4-78. Appeal to superior court.

Any person who is a party to a proceeding and who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any final order or action of the division shall have the right to appeal to the superior court of the county of the residence of such party. Such appeal shall be by petition which shall be filed in the office of the clerk of such court within 30 days after the final order or action of the division. The enforcement of the order or action appealed from shall not be stayed unless so ordered and directed by the reviewing court. No bond or cash shall be forfeited during an appeal. Upon the filing of such petition, the petitioner shall serve a copy thereof on the director of the division in the manner prescribed by law for the service of process.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 10; Ga. L. 1971, p. 200, § 5.)

12-4-79. Injunctive relief.

Whenever it shall appear to the division that any person, firm, or corporation or any agent, officer, or director of any person, firm, or corporation has violated any of the provisions of this part, the division, on its own motion or on the verified complaint in writing of any person, may file an equitable petition in its own name in the superior court of any county in this state having jurisdiction of the parties, alleging the facts and praying for a temporary restraining order and temporary injunction or permanent injunction against such person, firm, or corporation, or their agents, officers, and directors, restraining them from violating the provisions of this part. Upon proof of a violation, the court shall issue such restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction without requiring allegation or proof that the petitioner has no adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 200, § 6.)

12-4-80. Removal of minerals, ores, and other solid matter as prima-facie evidence of surface mining.

In any contested case under this part, whether administrative, civil, or criminal in nature, a showing of the removal of minerals, ores, and other solid matter from the premises in question shall constitute prima-facie evidence of surface mining.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 996, § 4.)

12-4-81. Judgment pursuant to order.

The director of the division may file in the superior court of the county wherein the mining operator under order resides, or if such mining operator is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, a certified copy of a final order issued pursuant to this part which is unappealed from, or of a final order issued pursuant to this part which is affirmed upon appeal, whereupon such court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 527, § 7.)

12-4-82. Applicability of part.

This part shall not apply to surface mining activities of the Department of Transportation incident to its activities in constructing, repairing, and maintaining the public road system in Georgia. The provisions of this Code section shall also extend to any person, firm, or corporation contracting with the Department of Transportation to construct, repair, or maintain public roads, provided that such contracts contain standards for the reclamation of the affected surface mining area; provided, further, that such standards have been approved by the division.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 12.)

12-4-83. Civil penalty; procedure for imposing penalties; hearing; judicial review; disposition of recovered penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, any mining operator violating any provision of this part or any of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, or who negligently or intentionally fails or refuses to comply with any final order of the director of the division, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for such violation and an additional civil penalty not to exceed $500.00 for each day during which such violation continues.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, whenever the director of the division has reason to believe that any mining operator has violated any provision of this part or any of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, or has negligently or intentionally failed or refused to comply with any final order of the director, the director may request and shall receive a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. Upon a finding that such mining operator has violated any provision of this part or any of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, or has negligently or intentionally failed or refused to comply with a final order of the director, the hearing officer shall issue his initial decision imposing such civil penalties as are provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2. All civil penalties recovered by the director shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund; provided, however, that where civil penalties are recovered by the director from a mining operator for his failing or refusing to obtain a permit in accordance with Code Section 12-4-75 or for his failing or refusing to complete any of his responsibilities under a mining land use plan after having been issued a permit, the director may expend as he deems appropriate that portion of such recovered civil penalties as is necessary to provide for reclamation, reconditioning, or rehabilitation of the affected land not otherwise reclaimed, reconditioned, or rehabilitated by such mining operator.

This Code section shall not apply to a mining operator who has a valid permit and who is bonded in accordance with this part.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 527, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1098, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-4-84. Criminal penalty.

Any person who engages in surface mining in violation of this part or who willfully misrepresents any fact in any matter required by this part or willfully gives false information in any application or report required by this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00 for each offense. Each day of noncompliance after notification shall be considered a separate offense.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 11.)